Wisconsin, session 2025, SB181.
do enact as follows:SB181,11Section 1. 66.0602 (3) (o) of the statutes is created to read:SB181,2,3266.0602 (3) (o) 1. In this paragraph, “regional” means consisting of a service 3area that is at least 232 square miles or includes at least 8 municipalities.SB181,2,1142. Subject to subds. 3., 4., 5., and 6., the limit otherwise applicable under this 5section does not apply to the amount, or a portion of that amount, that a political 6subdivision levies in that year for costs associated with regional emergency medical 7services, either through participation in a joint emergency medical services district 8or through one or more intergovernmental agreements to provide emergency 9medical services, or through both. The costs that are eligible for the exception to the 10limit that is described in this subdivision include costs associated with regional 11emergency medical services that are provided by a fire department.SB181,3,2123. The exception to the limit that is described in subd. 2. applies only if the 13amount levied under subd. 2. for the current year increases, relative to the amount 14levied under subd. 2. for the previous year, by a percentage that is less than or equal 15to the percentage change in the U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, 16U.S. city average, as determined by the U.S. department of labor, for the 12 months 17ending on August 31 of the year of the levy, plus 5 percent. This subdivision does 1not apply if the political subdivision did not levy an amount under subd. 2. for the 2previous year.SB181,3,634. The exception to the limit that is described in subd. 2. applies only if the 4joint emergency medical services district or political subdivision, as applicable, 5confirms to the department of revenue that the joint emergency medical services 6district or political subdivision, as applicable, has a regional service area.SB181,3,975. The exception to the limit that is described in subd. 2. applies only if a 8contract or other agreement identifies one entity as responsible for coordination of 9emergency medical services across the service area.SB181,3,11106. If a political subdivision levies an amount under subd. 2. for a year, no other 11paragraph in this subsection applies to that amount.SB181,212Section 2. 79.05 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB181,4,161379.05 (2) (c) Its municipal budget; exclusive of principal and interest on long-14term debt and exclusive of revenue sharing payments under s. 66.0305, payments of 15premiums under s. 66.0137 (5) (c) 1. and 1m., expenditures of amounts levied under 16s. 66.0602 (3) (o), revenues generated from a tax imposed under s. 77.701, payments 17received under s. 79.038, expenditures of payments due to the termination of a tax 18incremental district under s. 79.096 (3), recycling fee payments under s. 289.645, 19expenditures of grant payments under s. 16.297 (1m), unreimbursed expenses 20related to an emergency declared under s. 323.10, expenditures from moneys 21received pursuant to P.L. 111-5, grants received from the state or federal 22government for the purpose of providing law enforcement, fire protection, or 23emergency medical services, and expenditures made pursuant to a purchasing 24agreement with a school district whereby the municipality makes purchases on 1behalf of the school district; for the year of the statement under s. 79.015 increased 2over its municipal budget as adjusted under sub. (6); exclusive of principal and 3interest on long-term debt and exclusive of revenue sharing payments under s. 466.0305, payments of premiums under s. 66.0137 (5) (c) 1. and 1m., expenditures of 5amounts levied under s. 66.0602 (3) (o), revenues generated from a tax imposed 6under s. 77.701, payments received under s. 79.038, expenditures of payments due 7to the termination of a tax incremental district under s. 79.096 (3), recycling fee 8payments under s. 289.645, expenditures of grant payments under s. 16.297 (1m), 9unreimbursed expenses related to an emergency declared under s. 323.10, 10expenditures from moneys received pursuant to P.L. 111-5, grants received from the 11state or federal government for the purpose of providing law enforcement, fire 12protection, or emergency medical services, and expenditures made pursuant to a 13purchasing agreement with a school district whereby the municipality makes 14purchases on behalf of the school district; for the year before that year by less than 15the sum of the inflation factor and the valuation factor, rounded to the nearest 0.10 16percent.SB181,317Section 3. Initial applicability.SB181,4,2018(1) The treatment of s. 66.0602 (3) (o) first applies to a levy that is imposed in 19December of the year of the first January 1 after the effective date of this 20subsection.SB181,4,2121